Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.692

Victim and witness notification program—Notification enrollment.

Information and records prepared, owned, used, or retained by the department of corrections that reveal any notification or request for notification regarding any specific individual, or that reveal the identity, location of, or any information submitted by a person who requests or is invited to enroll for notification under RCW 72.09.712(2) or 72.09.710(1), are exempt from public inspection and copying under this chapter.

[ 2023 c 391 s 2.]